District of Columbia statutes.
22-3103

Penalties.

Violation of this chapter shall be a felony and shall be punished by:

(1)

A fine of not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01 or imprisonment for not more than 10 years, or both for the first offense; or

(2)

A fine of not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01 or imprisonment for not more than 20 years, or both for the 2nd and each subsequent offense.

Mar. 9, 1983, D.C. Law 4-173, § 4, 29 DCR 5749
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 233, 60 DCR 2064
1981 Ed., § 22-2013.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “not more than $5,000” in (1), and for “not more than $15,000” in (2).
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.